Washington statutes.
RCW 12.08.070

Verification.

Every complaint, answer, or reply shall be verified by the oath of the party pleading; or if he or she be not present, by the oath of his or her attorney or agent, to the effect that he or she believes it to be true. The verification shall be oral, or in writing, in conformity with the pleading verified.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3020; Code 1881 s 1762; 1873 p 345 s 61; 1854 p 232 s 49; RRS s 1784.]